Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [342.463] LOWER-POTENCY HEMP EDIBLE WHOLESALER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Authorization. new text end new text begin A wholesaler, as defined in section 340A.101, subdivision 28, with a valid license issued under chapter 340A may purchase and sell lower-potency hemp edibles subject to the requirements of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Registration. new text end new text begin Every wholesaler purchasing and selling lower-potency hemp edibles on or after April 1, 2025, must be registered with the office. A wholesaler must register in the form and manner established by the office. The sale of lower-potency hemp edibles by a person who is not registered with the office is prohibited and subject to the penalties in section 342.09, subdivision 6; any applicable criminal penalty; and any other applicable civil or administrative penalty. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Approved actions. new text end new text begin A registered wholesaler may: new text end new text begin (1) purchase lower-potency hemp edibles from cannabis microbusinesses, cannabis mezzobusinesses, cannabis cultivators, cannabis manufacturers, and lower-potency hemp edible manufacturers; new text end new text begin (2) sell lower-potency hemp edibles to lower-potency hemp edible retailers, cannabis microbusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis mezzobusinesses with a retail endorsement, cannabis retailers, and medical cannabis combination businesses; new text end new text begin (3) import lower-potency hemp edibles that contain hemp concentrate or artificially derived cannabinoids that are derived from hemp plants or hemp plant parts; and new text end new text begin (4) perform other actions approved by the office. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Operations. new text end new text begin (a) A registered wholesaler must maintain accurate records and ensure that appropriate labels remain affixed to lower-potency hemp edibles. new text end new text begin (b) A registered wholesaler must maintain compliance with state and local building, fire, and zoning requirements or regulations and must ensure that the wholesaler's premises are maintained in a clean and sanitary condition, free from infestation by insects, rodents, or other pests. new text end new text begin (c) A registered wholesaler may purchase and sell other products or items for which the wholesaler has a license or an authorization or that do not require a license or an authorization. Products for which no license or authorization is required include but are not limited to industrial hemp products, products that contain hemp grain, hemp-derived topical products, and cannabis paraphernalia. Cannabis paraphernalia includes but is not limited to childproof packaging containers and other devices designed to ensure the safe storage and monitoring of cannabis flower and cannabis products in the home to prevent access by individuals under 21 years of age. new text end new text begin (d) The limitations on financial relationships described in section 342.23, subdivision 5, apply to registered wholesalers. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Transportation of lower-potency hemp edibles. new text end new text begin (a) A registered wholesaler may transport lower-potency hemp edibles on public roadways if: new text end new text begin (1) the lower-potency hemp edibles are in final packaging; new text end new text begin (2) the lower-potency hemp edibles are packaged in tamper-evident containers that are not visible or recognizable from outside the transporting vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) the registered wholesaler has a shipping manifest in the registered wholesaler's possession that describes the contents of all tamper-evident containers; new text end new text begin (4) all departures, arrivals, and stops are appropriately documented; new text end new text begin (5) no person other than a designated employee enters a vehicle at any time that the vehicle is transporting lower-potency hemp edibles; and new text end new text begin (6) the registered wholesaler complies with any other rules adopted by the office related to the transportation of lower-potency hemp edibles by a lower-potency hemp edible retailer. new text end new text begin (b) Any vehicle assigned for the purposes of transporting lower-potency hemp edibles is subject to inspection at any time. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Importation of hemp-derived products. new text end new text begin (a) A registered wholesaler may sell products manufactured outside the boundaries of the state of Minnesota if: new text end new text begin (1) the manufacturer is licensed in another jurisdiction and subject to regulations designed to protect the health and safety of consumers that the office determines are substantially similar to the regulations in this state; or new text end new text begin (2) the registered wholesaler establishes, to the satisfaction of the office, that the manufacturer engages in practices that are substantially similar to the practices required for licensure of manufacturers in this state. new text end new text begin (b) The office may cancel the registration of a wholesaler who is prohibited from distributing products containing cannabinoids in any other jurisdiction, convicted of an offense involving the distribution of products containing cannabinoids in any other jurisdiction, or found liable for distributing any product that injured customers in any other jurisdiction. A registered wholesaler shall disclose all relevant information related to actions in another jurisdiction. Failure to disclose relevant information may result in disciplinary action by the office, including cancellation of a registration. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, it shall not be a defense in any civil or criminal action that a registered wholesaler relied on information on a product label or otherwise provided by a manufacturer who is not licensed in this state. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin The office may enforce this section under the relevant provisions of section 342.19, including but not limited to issuing administrative orders, embargoing products, and imposing civil penalties. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end